Alabama, session 2026rs, HB653.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-6-152, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§13A-6-152
(a) A person commits the crime of human trafficking in
Page 1

(a) A person commits the crime of human trafficking in
HB653 INTRODUCED
the first degree if:
(1) He or she knowingly subjects another person
individual to labor servitude or sexual servitude;
(2) He or she knowingly obtains, recruits, entices,
solicits, induces, threatens, isolates, harbors, holds,
restrains, transports, provides, or maintains any minor for
the purpose of causing a minor to engage in sexual servitude;
or
(3) He or she knowingly gives, or attempts to give,
monetary consideration or any other thing of value to engage
in any sexual conduct with a minor or an individual he or she
believes to be a minor.
(b) For purposes of this section, it is not required
that the defendant have knowledge of a minor victim's age, nor
is reasonable mistake of age a defense to liability under this
section.
(c) A corporation, or any other legal entity other than
an individual, may be prosecuted for human trafficking in the
first degree for an act or omission only if an agent of the
corporation or entity performs the conduct which is an element
of the crime while acting within the scope of his or her
office or employment and on behalf of the corporation or
entity, and the commission of the crime was either authorized,
requested, commanded, performed, or within the scope of the
person's employment on behalf of the corporation or entity or
constituted a pattern of conduct that an agent of the
corporation or entity knew or should have known was occurring.
(d) Any person who obstructs, or attempts to obstruct,
Page 2

(d) Any person who obstructs, or attempts to obstruct,
HB653 INTRODUCED
or in any way interferes with or prevents the enforcement of
this section shall be guilty of a Class A felony.
(e) Human trafficking in the first degree is a Class A
felony. In any prosecution under this section where the victim
was subjected to sexual servitude or in any prosecution under
this section where the defendant is nineteen 19 years old of
age or older and there is a minor trafficking victim, the
court shall sentence the defendant to a minimum of life
imprisonment."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3